oss_proto.lexc
!!!oss_proto.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +NOUN +VERB +ADJ +ADV +ADP +AUX +NUM +CCONJ +SCONJ +DET +NPROP +PART +Prenoun=Yes +Polarity=Neg +Poss=Yes +NumType=Ord +NumType=Card +Degree=Cmp +Case=Nom +Case=Gen +Case=Num +Case=Dat +Case=All +Case=Ine +Case=Abl +Case=Sup +Case=Equ +Case=Com +Case=Dir +Case=Rcs +VerbForm=Fin +VerbForm=Inf +VerbForm=Inf2 +VerbForm=Part +VerbForm=Part2 +VerbForm=Conv +VerbForm=Dest +Mood=Ind +Mood=Opt +Mood=Sub +Mood=Irr +Mood=Imp +Tr +Tense=Pres +Tense=Past +Tense=Fut +Person=1 +Person=2 +Person=3 +PronType=Prs +PronType=Dem +PronType=Int +PronType=Ind +PronType=Tot +PronType=Neg +Deixis=Remt +Deixis=Prox +PronType=Rcp

LEXICON Root
Adj ; 
Adv ;
Adp ;
Noun ;
Verb ;
NumCard ;
NumOrd ;
Cconj ;
Sconj ;
Part ;
Det ;
Pron ;
Aux ;
Nprop ;

### ЧР

LEXICON AdjLabel
+ADJ:0 AdjInfl ;
+ADJ:0 #;

LEXICON AdjLabelPN
+ADJ+Prenoun=Yes:0 AdjInfl ;
+ADJ+Prenoun=Yes:0 #;

LEXICON NumOrdLabel
+ADJ+NumType=Ord:0 AdjInfl ;
+ADJ+NumType=Ord:0 #;

LEXICON AdvLabel
+ADV:0 AdjInfl ;
+ADV:0 #;

LEXICON AdvLabelPN
+ADV+Prenoun=Yes:0 AdjInfl ;
+ADV+Prenoun=Yes:0 #;

###

LEXICON AdpLabel
+ADP:0 #;

LEXICON CconjLabel
+CCONJ:0 #;

LEXICON CconjNegLabel
+CCONJ+Polarity=Neg:0 #;

LEXICON SconjLabel
+SCONJ:0 #;

LEXICON SconjNegLabel
+SCONJ+Polarity=Neg:0 #;

LEXICON SconjConvLabel
+SCONJ+VerbForm=Conv:0 #;

LEXICON PartLabel
+PART:0 #;

LEXICON PartNegLabel
+PART+Polarity=Neg:0 #;

###

LEXICON AuxIntrStemPresLabel
+AUX:0 VIntrStemPres ;

LEXICON AuxIntrStemPastLabel
+AUX:0 VIntrStemPast ;

LEXICON AuxTrStemPresLabel
+AUX:0 VTrStemPres ;

LEXICON AuxTrStemPastLabel
+AUX:0 VTrStemPast ;

###

LEXICON VerbIntrStemPresLabel
+VERB:0 VIntrStemPres ;

LEXICON VerbIntrStemPastLabel
+VERB:0 VIntrStemPast ;

LEXICON VerbTrStemPresLabel
+VERB:0 VTrStemPres;

LEXICON VerbTrStemPastLabel
+VERB:0 VTrStemPast ;

###

LEXICON VerbIntrStemPresLabelPV
+VERB+Preverb=Yes:0 VIntrStemPres ;

LEXICON VerbIntrStemPastLabelPV
+VERB+Preverb=Yes:0 VIntrStemPast ;

LEXICON VerbTrStemPresLabelPV
+VERB+Preverb=Yes:0 VTrStemPres;

LEXICON VerbTrStemPastLabelPV
+VERB+Preverb=Yes:0 VTrStemPast ;

###

LEXICON VerbPtcpPstLabel
+VERB+VerbForm=Part+Tense=Past+Voice=Pass:0 #;

LEXICON VerbPtcpPstLabelPV
+VERB+Preverb=Yes+VerbForm=Part+Tense=Past+Voice=Pass:0 #;

LEXICON AuxPtcpPstLabel
+AUX+VerbForm=Part+Tense=Past+Voice=Pass:0 #;

###

LEXICON NounLabel
+NOUN+Number=Sing+Case=Nom:0 # ;
+NOUN+Number=Sing:0 Case ;
+NOUN+Number=Plur+Case=Nom:тӕ # ;
+NOUN+Number=Plur+Case=All:тӕм # ;
+NOUN+Number=Plur:т Case ;

LEXICON NounLabelPN
+NOUN+Prenoun=Yes+Number=Sing+Case=Nom:0 # ;
+NOUN+Prenoun=Yes+Number=Sing:0 Case ;
+NOUN+Prenoun=Yes+Number=Plur+Case=Nom:тӕ # ;
+NOUN+Prenoun=Yes+Number=Plur+Case=All:тӕм # ;
+NOUN+Prenoun=Yes+Number=Plur:т Case ;

LEXICON NounTTLabel
+NOUN+Number=Sing+Case=Nom:0 # ;
+NOUN+Number=Sing:0 Case ;
+NOUN+Number=Plur+Case=Nom:ттӕ # ;
+NOUN+Number=Plur+Case=All:ттӕм # ;
+NOUN+Number=Plur:тт Case ;

LEXICON NumLabel
+NUM+NumType=Card+Case=Nom:0 # ;
+NUM+NumType=Card:0 Case ;
+NUM+NumType=Card+Number=Plur+Case=Nom:тӕ # ;
+NUM+NumType=Card+Number=Plur+Case=All:тӕм # ;
+NUM+NumType=Card+Number=Plur:т Case ;

LEXICON NpropLabel
+NPROP+Case=Nom:0 # ;
+NPROP:0 Case ;
+NPROP+Number=Plur+Case=Nom:тӕ # ;
+NPROP+Number=Plur+Case=All:тӕм # ;
+NPROP+Number=Plur:т Case ;

###

LEXICON 1SgPoss
+DET+PronType=Prs+Person=1+Number=Sing+Poss=Yes:0 #;

LEXICON 2SgPoss
+DET+PronType=Prs+Person=2+Number=Sing+Poss=Yes:0 #;

LEXICON 3SgPoss
+DET+PronType=Prs+Person=3+Number=Sing+Poss=Yes:0 #;

LEXICON 1PlPoss
+DET+PronType=Prs+Person=1+Number=Plur+Poss=Yes:0 #;

LEXICON 2PlPoss
+DET+PronType=Prs+Person=2+Number=Plur+Poss=Yes:0 #;

LEXICON 3PlPoss
+DET+PronType=Prs+Person=3+Number=Plur+Poss=Yes:0 #;

###

LEXICON PronLabel
+PRON+Number=Sing+Case=Nom:0 # ;
+PRON+Number=Sing:0 Case ;
+PRON+Number=Plur+Case=Nom:тӕ # ;
+PRON+Number=Plur+Case=All:тӕм # ;
+PRON+Number=Plur:т Case ;

LEXICON PronDemDistPlLabel
+PRON+PronType=Dem+Deixis=Remt+Number=Plur+Case=Nom:0 # ;
+PRON+PronType=Dem+Deixis=Remt+Number=Plur+Case=Gen:0 # ;
+PRON+PronType=Dem+Deixis=Remt+Number=Plur:0 Case ;

LEXICON PronDemProxPlLabel
+PRON+PronType=Dem+Deixis=Prox+Number=Plur+Case=Nom:0 # ;
+PRON+PronType=Dem+Deixis=Prox+Number=Plur+Case=Gen:0 # ;
+PRON+PronType=Dem+Deixis=Prox+Number=Plur:0 Case ;

LEXICON PronIntLabel
+PRON+PronType=Int+Number=Sing+Case=Nom:0 # ;
+PRON+PronType=Int+Number=Sing:0 Case ;
+PRON+PronType=Int+Number=Plur+Case=Nom:тӕ # ;
+PRON+PronType=Int+Number=Plur+Case=All:тӕм # ;
+PRON+PronType=Int+Number=Plur:т Case ;

LEXICON PronIndLabel
+PRON+PronType=Ind+Number=Sing+Case=Nom:0 # ;
+PRON+PronType=Ind+Number=Sing:0 Case ;
+PRON+PronType=Ind+Number=Plur+Case=Nom:тӕ # ;
+PRON+PronType=Ind+Number=Plur+Case=All:тӕм # ;
+PRON+PronType=Ind+Number=Plur:т Case ;

LEXICON PronRcpLabel
+PRON+PronType=Rcp+Number=Sing+Case=Nom:0 # ;
+PRON+PronType=Rcp+Number=Sing+Case=Gen:0 # ;
+PRON+PronType=Rcp+Number=Sing:0 Case ;
+PRON+PronType=Rcp+Number=Plur+Case=Nom:тӕ # ;
+PRON+PronType=Rcp+Number=Plur+Case=All:тӕм # ;
+PRON+PronType=Rcp+Number=Plur:т Case ;

LEXICON PronTotLabel
+PRON+PronType=Tot+Number=Sing+Case=Nom:0 # ;
+PRON+PronType=Tot+Number=Sing:0 Case ;
+PRON+PronType=Tot+Number=Plur+Case=Nom:тӕ # ;
+PRON+PronType=Tot+Number=Plur+Case=All:тӕм # ;
+PRON+PronType=Tot+Number=Plur:т Case ;

###

LEXICON DetDemProxLabel
+DET+PronType=Dem+Deixis=Prox:0 #;
+PRON+PronType=Dem+Deixis=Prox+Number=Sing+Case=Nom:0 # ;
+PRON+PronType=Dem+Deixis=Prox+Number=Sing:0 Case ;
+PRON+PronType=Dem+Deixis=Prox+Number=Plur+Case=Nom:тӕ # ;
+PRON+PronType=Dem+Deixis=Prox+Number=Plur+Case=All:тӕм # ;
+PRON+PronType=Dem+Deixis=Prox+Number=Plur:т Case ;

LEXICON DetDemRemtLabel
+DET+PronType=Dem+Deixis=Remt:0 #;
+PRON+PronType=Dem+Deixis=Remt+Number=Sing+Case=Nom:0 # ;
+PRON+PronType=Dem+Deixis=Remt+Number=Sing:0 Case ;
+PRON+PronType=Dem+Deixis=Remt+Number=Plur+Case=Nom:тӕ # ;
+PRON+PronType=Dem+Deixis=Remt+Number=Plur+Case=All:тӕм # ;
+PRON+PronType=Dem+Deixis=Remt+Number=Plur:т Case ;

LEXICON DetIndLabel
+DET+PronType=Ind:0 #;
+PRON+PronType=Ind+Number=Sing+Case=Nom:0 # ;
+PRON+PronType=Ind+Number=Sing:0 Case ;
+PRON+PronType=Ind+Number=Plur+Case=Nom:тӕ # ;
+PRON+PronType=Ind+Number=Plur+Case=All:тӕм # ;
+PRON+PronType=Ind+Number=Plur:т Case ;

LEXICON DetIntLabel
+DET+PronType=Int:0 #;
+PRON+PronType=Int+Number=Sing+Case=Nom:0 # ;
+PRON+PronType=Int+Number=Sing:0 Case ;
+PRON+PronType=Int+Number=Plur+Case=Nom:тӕ # ;
+PRON+PronType=Int+Number=Plur+Case=All:тӕм # ;
+PRON+PronType=Int+Number=Plur:т Case ;

LEXICON DetNegLabel
+DET+PronType=Neg:0 #;
+PRON+PronType=Neg+Number=Sing+Case=Nom:0 # ;
+PRON+PronType=Neg+Number=Sing:0 Case ;
+PRON+PronType=Neg+Number=Plur+Case=Nom:тӕ # ;
+PRON+PronType=Neg+Number=Plur+Case=All:тӕм # ;
+PRON+PronType=Neg+Number=Plur:т Case ;

LEXICON DetTotLabel
+DET+PronType=Tot:0 #;
+PRON+PronType=Tot+Number=Sing+Case=Nom:0 # ;
+PRON+PronType=Tot+Number=Sing:0 Case ;
+PRON+PronType=Tot+Number=Plur+Case=Nom:тӕ # ;
+PRON+PronType=Tot+Number=Plur+Case=All:тӕм # ;
+PRON+PronType=Tot+Number=Plur:т Case ;

###

LEXICON AdvDemLabel
+ADV+PronType=Dem:0 #;
+PRON+PronType=Dem+Case=Nom:0 # ;
+PRON+PronType=Dem:0 Case ;
+PRON+PronType=Dem+Number=Plur+Case=Nom:тӕ # ;
+PRON+PronType=Dem+Number=Plur+Case=All:тӕм # ;
+PRON+PronType=Dem+Number=Plur:т Case ;

LEXICON AdvDemProxLabel
+ADV+PronType=Dem+Deixis=Prox:0 #;
+PRON+PronType=Dem+Deixis=Prox+Case=Nom:0 # ;
+PRON+PronType=Dem+Deixis=Prox:0 Case ;
+PRON+PronType=Dem+Deixis=Prox+Number=Plur+Case=Nom:тӕ # ;
+PRON+PronType=Dem+Deixis=Prox+Number=Plur+Case=All:тӕм # ;
+PRON+PronType=Dem+Deixis=Prox+Number=Plur:т Case ;

LEXICON AdvDemRemtLabel
+ADV+PronType=Dem+Deixis=Remt:0 #;
+PRON+PronType=Dem+Deixis=Remt+Case=Nom:0 # ;
+PRON+PronType=Dem+Deixis=Remt:0 Case ;
+PRON+PronType=Dem+Deixis=Remt+Number=Plur+Case=Nom:тӕ # ;
+PRON+PronType=Dem+Deixis=Remt+Number=Plur+Case=All:тӕм # ;
+PRON+PronType=Dem+Deixis=Remt+Number=Plur:т Case ;

LEXICON Adj
ӕнӕвдӕлон AdjLabelPN ;
ӕнӕмӕнг AdjLabelPN ;
ӕнӕсмудӕн AdjLabelPN ;
ӕнӕфердӕхт AdjLabelPN ;
ӕнӕхъыпп-ӕнӕсыпп AdjLabelPN ;
ртӕтоннон AdjLabel ;
зынӕрвӕссон AdjLabel ;
программон AdjLabel ;
уӕлбикъӕт AdjLabel ;
хӕтӕнхауджы AdjLabel ;
LEXICON Adp
мхал AdpLabel ;
хсӕн AdpLabel ;
мидӕг AdpLabel ;
тыххӕй AdpLabel ;
хуызӕн AdpLabel ;
LEXICON Adv
мӕнӕ AdvDemLabel ;
йер AdvDemLabel ;
ӕр AdvDemLabel ;
гъер AdvDemLabel ;
афтӕмӕй AdvDemProxLabel ;
ахӕм AdvDemProxLabel ;
йафтӕ AdvDemProxLabel ;
йахӕм AdvDemProxLabel ;
йӕд AdvDemRemtLabel ;
уалынмӕ AdvDemRemtLabel ;
уӕдӕ AdvDemRemtLabel ;
уымӕн AdvDemRemtLabel ;
дзудгӕ AdvLabel ;
ӕндӕрыдӕм AdvLabel ;
ӕнӕвгъау AdvLabelPN ;
ӕнӕлӕугӕ AdvLabelPN ;
ӕнӕразыйӕ AdvLabelPN ;
ӕнӕсцух AdvLabelPN ;
ӕнӕхъыпп-ӕнӕсыпп AdvLabelPN ;
бонивгъуыд AdvLabel ;
иугуырӕй AdvLabel ;
фӕсвӕд AdvLabel ;
LEXICON Noun
нӕзивӕгдзинад NounLabelPN ;
нӕлӕг NounLabelPN ;
ӕнӕсомы NounLabelPN ;
ӕнӕхъауджыдзинад NounLabelPN ;
ӕртӕдзыхон NounTTLabel ;
ӕфстауисджы NounLabel ;
зӕрӕстон NounTTLabel ;
колхоз NounLabel ;
пъагӕ NounTTLabel ;
сахаруӕт NounLabel ;
файтон NounTTLabel ;
хуыснӕгдзау NounLabel ;
LEXICON Nprop 
алмӕхсидт NpropLabel ;
владимир NpropLabel ;
спартак NpropLabel ;
елда NpropLabel ;
LEXICON Verb
ӕлхӕн VerbTrStemPresLabel ;
мбӕрст VerbTrStemPastLabel ;
ндӕдз VerbIntrStemPresLabel ;
нкъуысыд VerbIntrStemPastLabel ;
нтыд VerbPtcpPstLabel ;
ӕрхъӕлф VerbTrStemPresLabel ;
ӕфсӕст VerbTrStemPastLabel ;
ӕххӕл VerbIntrStemPresLabel ;
бадт VerbIntrStemPastLabel ;
зад VerbPtcpPstLabel ;
зырхт VerbTrStemPastLabel ;
ных VerbTrStemPresLabel ;
руай VerbIntrStemPresLabel ;
рӕмпъызт VerbTrStemPastLabel ;
рӕтъызт VerbPtcpPstLabel ;
рӕхцыд VerbIntrStemPastLabel ;
фӕлмӕцыд VerbPtcpPstLabel ;
хъар VerbIntrStemPresLabel ;
цым VerbTrStemPresLabel ;
цард VerbIntrStemPastLabel ;
ахуд VerbIntrStemPresLabelPV ;
ахъавыд VerbIntrStemPastLabelPV ;
рӕвгӕ VerbTrStemPresLabelPV ;
ӕрӕвнӕлдт VerbTrStemPastLabelPV ;
ӕрбадт VerbPtcpPstLabelPV ;
рбатил VerbTrStemPresLabelPV ;
ӕрбауай VerbIntrStemPresLabelPV ;
рбауӕндыд VerbIntrStemPastLabelPV ;
ӕрбафснайдт VerbTrStemPastLabelPV ;
ӕртыхт VerbPtcpPstLabelPV ;
бауы VerbIntrStemPresLabelPV ;
бахуд VerbIntrStemPastLabelPV ;
бацахст VerbPtcpPstLabelPV ;
ныббӕтт VerbTrStemPresLabelPV ;
ныргӕвст VerbTrStemPastLabelPV ;
срызт VerbPtcpPstLabelPV ;
схъаз VerbIntrStemPresLabelPV ;
фӕлыгът VerbIntrStemPastLabelPV ;
фӕфыс VerbTrStemPresLabelPV ;
фехӕлдт VerbTrStemPastLabelPV ;
уы AuxIntrStemPresLabel ;
уыд AuxIntrStemPastLabel ;
уӕв AuxIntrStemPresLabel ;
кӕн AuxTrStemPresLabel ;
кӕ AuxTrStemPresLabel ;
кодт AuxTrStemPastLabel ;
конд AuxPtcpPstLabel ;
ласт AuxTrStemPresLabel ;
вӕйй AuxTrStemPresLabel ;
фӕндз NumLabel ;
дӕс NumLabel ;
ӕстдӕс NumLabel ;
ӕвдай NumLabel ;
цыппӕрӕм NumOrdLabel ;
авдӕм NumOrdLabel ;
дыууадӕсӕм NumOrdLabel ;
ссӕдзӕм NumOrdLabel ;
сӕдӕӕм NumOrdLabel ;
йед PronLabel ;
йӕд PronLabel ;
тед PronLabel ;
адон PronDemProxPlLabel ;
уыдон PronDemDistPlLabel ;
ӕппӕт PronTotLabel ;
ппӕт PronTotLabel ;
цал PronIntLabel ;
цалдӕр PronIndLabel ;
цалдӕриддӕр PronIndLabel ;
кӕрӕдзи PronRcpLabel ;
мӕ 1SgPoss ;
дӕ 2SgPoss ;
йӕ 3SgPoss ;
нӕ 1PlPoss ;
уӕ 2PlPoss ;
сӕ 3PlPoss ;
ме 1SgPoss ;
де 2SgPoss ;
йе 3SgPoss ;
не 1PlPoss ;
уе 2PlPoss ;
се 3PlPoss ;
айас DetDemProxLabel ;
ахӕм DetDemProxLabel ;
а DetDemProxLabel ;
йахӕм DetDemProxLabel ;
уыцы DetDemRemtLabel ;
уыйас DetDemRemtLabel ;
цавӕр DetIntLabel ;
цӕвӕр DetIntLabel ;
цас DetIntLabel ;
цӕхӕм DetIntLabel ;
исты DetIndLabel ;
кӕцыдӕр DetIndLabel ;
цыдӕр DetIndLabel ;
цасдӕриддӕр DetIndLabel ;
алы DetTotLabel ;
ӕгас DetTotLabel ;
ӕнӕхъӕн DetTotLabel ;
иууылдӕр DetTotLabel ;
никӕцы DetNegLabel ;
ницы DetNegLabel ;
макӕцы DetNegLabel ;
мацы DetNegLabel ;
мӕ CconjLabel ;
кӕнӕ CconjLabel ;
ӕви CconjLabel ;
ӕндӕра CconjLabel ;
кӕннодӕ CconjLabel ;
нӕдӕр CconjNegLabel ;
мӕ SconjLabel ;
куыд SconjLabel ;
кӕд SconjLabel ;
цыма SconjLabel ;
нӕуӕд SconjNegLabel ;
науӕд SconjNegLabel ;
нӕмӕ SconjNegLabel ;
намӕ SconjNegLabel ;
зӕгъгӕ SconjConvLabel ;
ома PartLabel ;
та PartLabel ;
дам PartLabel ;
афтид PartLabel ;
нӕ PartNegLabel ;
нал PartNegLabel ;
не PartNegLabel ;
нӕма PartNegLabel ;
